Utah statutes.
78B-5-512.   Property held by joint tenants or tenants in common.

If an individual and another own property in this state as joint tenants or tenants in common, a creditor of the individual, subject to the individual's right to claim an exemption under this part, may obtain a levy on and sale of the interest of the individual in the property.  A creditor who has obtained a levy, or a purchaser who has purchased the individual's interest at the sale, may have the property partitioned or the individual's interest severed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

